Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2608
Removal; when; department; powers.

Any junkyard in existence on August 27, 1971, which does not qualify for a permit under section 39-2605 and which cannot, as a practical matter, be screened may be removed. The department may acquire by gift, purchase, exchange or condemnation from the owner, such interests in lands as may be necessary to acquire the location, or to effect the removal or disposal of such junkyards.

Laws 1971, LB 398, § 8;

Laws 1995, LB 264, § 31.